NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/de_AT/de_AT.aff
SFX O Y 21
SFX O   n       tes        e[lr]n
SFX O   n       tes        [dtw]en
SFX O   en      tes        [^dmntw]en
SFX O   n       tes        chnen
SFX O   en      tes        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX O   n       tes        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX O   en      tes        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX O   n       ter        e[lr]n
SFX O   n       ter        [dtw]en
SFX O   en      ter        [^dmntw]en
SFX O   n       ter        chnen
SFX O   en      ter        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX O   n       ter        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX O   en      ter        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX O   n       tem        e[lr]n
SFX O   n       tem        [dtw]en
SFX O   en      tem        [^dmntw]en
SFX O   n       tem        chnen
SFX O   en      tem        [^c]h[mn]en
SFX O   n       tem        [^aäehilmnoöuür][mn]en
SFX O   en      tem        [aäeilmnoöuür][mn]en

REP 28
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP ß ss
REP ss ß
REP s ss
REP ss s
REP i ie
REP ie i
REP ee e
REP o oh
REP oh o
REP a ah
REP ah a
REP e eh
REP eh e
REP ae ä
REP oe ö
REP ue ü
REP Ae Ä
REP Oe Ö
REP Ue Ü
REP d t
REP t d
REP th t
REP t th
REP r rh
REP ch k
REP k ch
#REP eee ee-E


# this one will allow "-Eltern" - Hunspell 1.1.5 bug, but CHECKSHARPS obsoletes LANG de_DE
#LANG de_DE
CHECKSHARPS


COMPOUNDBEGIN x
COMPOUNDMIDDLE y
COMPOUNDEND z
FORBIDDENWORD d

# Prefixes are allowed at the beginning of compounds,
# suffixes are allowed at the end of compounds by default:
# (prefix)?(root)+(affix)?
# Affixes with COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG may be inside of compounds.
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG c

ONLYINCOMPOUND o

# my PSEUDOROOT h(elper) flag
NEEDAFFIX h

# forbid uppercase characters at compound word bounds
# BUT I want to take care about it myself ;-)
# CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE
KEEPCASE w

# Affixes  signed  with CIRCUMFIX flag may be on a word when this word also has a prefix with CIRCUMFIX flag and vice versa.
# for decapitalizing nouns with fogemorphemes
CIRCUMFIX f

# this one would make a separate dict entry "Denkmalsschutz" invalidate the
# compound of "Denkmal"+"schutz". We do not want this feature here...
# CHECKCOMPOUNDREP

# make not all possible suggestions for typos of Flicken or some rare words
NOSUGGEST n

WORDCHARS ß-.

# - setting this to 2 decreases performance by 1/10 but is needed for "öl" and "ei"
# - setting this to 1 for handling Fuge-elements with dashes (Arbeits-) dash will 
#   be a special word but - is handled as a affix now
COMPOUNDMIN 2

# this ones are for Duden R36 (old orthography)
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 2  #oldspell
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ee e #oldspell
#CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oo o #oldspell
# also need oo o

# this one needs to be flagable to be used for old orthography
#CHECKCOMPOUNDTRIPLE


PFX i Y 1
PFX i 0 -/coyf .

SFX j Y 3
SFX j 0 0/xoc .
SFX j 0 -/zocf .
SFX j 0 -/cz .

# Female forms for compound/Compound words:
# attention: [^e][^n] does also filter out "...er" !
SFX g Y 12
SFX g 0  innen/xyoc [^n]
SFX g en innen/xyoc en
SFX g 0  Innen/xyoc [^n]
SFX g en Innen/xyoc en
SFX g 0  innen/xyocf [^n]
SFX g en innen/xyocf en
SFX g 0  Innen/xyocf [^n]
SFX g en Innen/xyocf en
SFX g 0  innen-/cz [^n]
SFX g en innen-/cz en
SFX g 0  Innen-/cz [^n]
SFX g en Innen-/cz en


PFX k Y 2
PFX k 0 -/coxf .
PFX k 0 0/coy .

SFX e Y 2
SFX e 0 0/yoc .
SFX e 0 -/zc .

# for Uppercased end-words to prepend - and lowercase: (Tier/EPSm) (EX: Bettbezüge und *-laken*)
# AND
# for lowercased end-words to prepend - and re-uppercase : (tier/EPSozm) (EX: Arbeits*-Tier*)
#PFX m A -a/co A
#PFX m a -/ a
PFX m Y 58
PFX m A -a A
PFX m B -b B
PFX m C -c C
PFX m D -d D
PFX m E -e E
PFX m F -f F
PFX m G -g G
PFX m H -h H
PFX m I -i I
PFX m J -j J
PFX m K -k K
PFX m L -l L
PFX m M -m M
PFX m N -n N
PFX m O -o O
PFX m P -p P
PFX m Q -q Q
PFX m R -r R
PFX m S -s S
PFX m T -t T
PFX m U -u U
PFX m V -v V
PFX m W -w W
PFX m X -x X
PFX m Y -y Y
PFX m Z -z Z
PFX m Ä -ä Ä
PFX m Ö -ö Ö
PFX m Ü -ü Ü
PFX m a -A/co a
PFX m b -B/co b
PFX m c -C/co c
PFX m d -D/co d
PFX m e -E/co e
PFX m f -F/co f
PFX m g -G/co g
PFX m h -H/co h
PFX m i -I/co i
PFX m j -J/co j
PFX m k -K/co k
PFX m l -L/co l
PFX m m -M/co m
PFX m n -N/co n
PFX m o -O/co o
PFX m p -P/co p
PFX m q -Q/co q
PFX m r -R/co r
PFX m s -S/co s
PFX m t -T/co t
PFX m u -U/co u
PFX m v -V/co v
PFX m w -W/co w
PFX m x -X/co x
PFX m y -Y/co y
PFX m z -Z/co z
PFX m ä -Ä/co ä
PFX m ö -Ö/co ö
PFX m ü -Ü/co ü


# Decapitalizing: (not used ATM... )
# /co(f) : compound permit, in coumpount only, (decapitalizing with fogemorphemes)
#PFX l Y 29
#PFX l A a/co A
#PFX l Ä ä/co Ä
#PFX l B b/co B
#PFX l C c/co C
#PFX l D d/co D
#PFX l E e/co E
#PFX l F f/co F
#PFX l G g/co G
#PFX l H h/co H
#PFX l I i/co I
#PFX l J j/co J
#PFX l K k/co K
#PFX l L l/co L
#PFX l M m/co M
#PFX l N n/co N
#PFX l O o/co O
#PFX l Ö ö/co Ö
#PFX l P p/co P
#PFX l Q q/co Q
#PFX l R r/co R
#PFX l S s/co S
#PFX l T t/co T
#PFX l U u/co U
#PFX l Ü ü/co Ü
#PFX l V v/co V
#PFX l W w/co W
#PFX l X x/co X
#PFX l Y y/co Y
#PFX l Z z/co Z

# private hunspell flags:
# --x : not for capmain (rare words)

# With "BREAK -" some wrong forms are accepted but that is needed for US-Wirtschaft etc.
# So enabling this is the lesser evil. No perfect solution found so far...
BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK .
